dicts/dsb/dsb.dic
barcaś/U
běžaś/U
bincaś/U
bjacaś/U
blěźeś/V
błudnjeś/V
braś/T
brojś/Z
brucaś/U
brunjeś/V
bycaś/U
byrcaś/U
chamornjeś/V
charcaś/U
chłodnjeś/V
chórlawjeś/V
chromjeś/V
dobraś/T
dobydnuś/3
dobyś/3
dodojś/Z
dodrěś/T
dognaś/T
dojś/Z1
dolažaś/Y
dopomjeś/V
dopomnjeś/V
dopowěźeś/V
dopšosćeś/V
dopśimjeś/V
dosraś/T
dostaś/2
dowisaś/Y
dowugojś/Z
dowugójś/Z
dowuśišćaś/Y
doźaržaś/Y
dwójś/Z
głodnjeś/V
głoźeś/V
gnaś/T
gnercaś/U
gnojś/Z
gnurcaś/U
gójś/Z
górjeś/V
gramjeś/V
jěsć/X
kircaś/U
kjawcaś/U
klincaś/U
kłojś/Z
kórcaś/U
kurcaś/U
kwicaś/U
kyrcaś/U
łacnjeś/V
łojś/Z
marnjeś/V
měkleś/V
mjawcaś/U
mjazypśizemjeś/V
mjelcaś/U
mjernjeś/V
morcaś/U
mócnjeś/V
mrojś/Z
mucaś/U
mucnjeś/V
musaś/U
naběžaś/Y
nabyś/3
nadejś/1
nadrěś/T
nagnaś/T
najěsć/X
najmjeś/V
najś/1
nakłojś/Z
nalažaś/Y
napojś/Z
napódejś/1
nascaś/Y
nasmarcaś/Y
naspomnjeś/V
nasraś/T
nastaś/2
našwicaś/Y
naśišćaś/Y
nawódnjeś/V
naznojś/Z
nažraś/T
naźaržaś/Y
njewugójś/Z
pišćaś/U
plěsniwjeś/V
plišćaś/U
popnjeś/V
powěźeś/V
pódegnaś/T
pódejś/1
pódlažaś/U
pódnajmjeś/V
pódojś/Z
pódpśimjeś/V
pódrěś/T
pódwójś/Z
pódźaržaś/Y
pógnaś/T
pógnojś/Z
pójmjeś/V
pójś/1
pólažaś/Y
pósłaś/T
pósmarcaś/Y
póšwicaś/Y
póśišćaś/Y
pótšojś/Z
pówustaś/2
pózastaś/2
póznojś/Z
późaržaś/Y
prochniwjeś/V
projś/Z
pšosćeś/V
pšostnjeś/V
pśeběžaś/Y
pśebraś/T
pśebrojś/Z
pśebyś/3
pśedlažaś/U
pśedobyś/3
pśedostaś/2
pśegłodnjeś/V
pśegnojś/Z
pśejěsć/X
pśejmjeś/V
pśejś/1
pśeklincaś/Y
pśekłojś/Z
pśekšawjeś/V
pśelažaś/Y
pśemjelcaś/Y
pśenajmjeś/V
pśepśimjeś/V
pśerdžaś/Y
pśesłyšaś/Y
pśesmarcaś/Y
pśestaś/2
pśeswójś/Z
pśeśišćaś/Y
pśewisaś/Y
pśezarzaś/Y
pśeznojś/Z
pśežraś/T
pśezymnjeś/V
pśeźaržaś/Y
pśibarcaś/Y
pśibraś/T
pśidobyś/3
pśidognaś/T
pśidostaś/2
pśignaś/T
pśipowěźeś/VX
pśipósłaś/T
pśipśimjeś/V
pśipśiś/1
pśispomnjeś/V
pśiśišćaś/Y
pśiwódnjeś/V
pśiwóźeś/V
pśizemjeś/V
pśiźaržaś/Y
rdžaś/U
rojś/Z
rozběžaś/Y
rozbrojś/Z
rozdwójś/Z
rozebraś/T
rozegnaś/T
rozejś/1
rozesłaś/T
rozežraś/T
rozgnaś/T
rozkłojś/Z
rozmucaś/Y
rozpowěźeś/VX
rozpósłaś/T
rozprochnjeś/V
rozprojś/Z
rozžydnjeś/V
ryjnjeś/V
scaś/U
schamornjeś/V
schórjeś/V
šćacaś/U
šćawcaś/U
šćercaś/U
šerjeś/V
seśeznojś/Z
skamjenjeś/V
skłojś/Z
slěpjeś/V
słabjeś/V
słaś/T
słyšaś/U
smarcaś/U
splěsniwjeś/V
splěsnjeś/V
spokojś/Z
spomjeś/V
spomnjeś/V
spopnjeś/V
spowěźeś/VX
sprochniwjeś/V
spšostnjeś/V
sraś/T
starjeś/V
staś/2
štycaś/U
šumjeś/V
surowjeś/V
šwarcaś/U
šwicaś/U
šwjercaś/U
šwyrcaś/U
śišćaś/U
tšojś/Z
tšurcaś/U
tśasaś/nU
tucnjeś/V
warcaś/U
wěźeś/X
wisaś/U
wiśaś/U
wobegnaś/T
wobejmjeś/V
wobejś/1
woběžaś/Y
wobežraś/T
wobgnaś/T
wobjěsć/X
woblěźeś/V
wobłudnjeś/V
wobraś/T
wobrunjeś/V
wobryjnjeś/V
wobscaś/Y
wobšerjeś/V
wobspomnjeś/V
wobsraś/T
wobstaś/2
wobšwarcaś/Y
wobšwyrcaś/Y
wobwarcaś/Y
wobźaržaś/Y
wochamnjeś/V
wochłodnjeś/V
wochromjeś/V
wochudnjeś/V
wogłupjeś/V
wognaś/T
wogramjeś/V
wokoło/1
womódrjeś/V
womucaś/Y
womucnjeś/V
wopojś/Z
wopomnjeś/V
wopowěźeś/VX
wopšosćeś/V
wopśestaś/2
wopśimjeś/V
woryjnjeś/V
wostaś/2
wócuśeś/V
wójś/1
wóryjnjeś/V
wóscaś/Y
wóšerjeś/V
wóslěpjeś/V
wósłabjeś/V
wósraś/T
wóstaś/2
wótběžaś/Y
wótbydnuś/3
wótbyś/3
wótdobyś/3
wótebraś/T
wótejś/1
wótežraś/T
wótgóniś/T
wótjěsć/X
wótkłojś/Z
wótlažaś/Y
wótłojś/Z
wótnajmjeś/V
wótpowěźeś/VX
wótpósłaś/T
wótprojś/Z
wótšwicaś/Y
wótśišćaś/Y
wótupjeś/V
wótzabyś/3
wótzarzaś/Y
wótžywjeś/V
wótźaržaś/Y
wóžraś/T
wózymnjeś/V
wóžywjeś/V
wóźibjeś/V
wóźiwjeś/V
wrjašćaś/U
wuběžaś/Y
wubraś/T
wubyś/3
wudobyś/3
wudojś/Z
wudostaś/2
wugłoźeś/V
wugnaś/T
wugnojś/Z
wugójś/Z
wujěsć/X
wujś/1
wuklincaś/Y
wukłojś/Z
wukšawjeś/V
wulažaś/Y
wułojś/Z
wumjelcaś/Y
wumucnjeś/V
wunuchtarnjeś/V
wupowěźeś/VX
wupósłaś/T
wuprojś/Z
wusłaś/T
wusłyšaś/Y
wusmarcaś/Y
wuspokojś/Z
wustaś/2
wušwicaś/Y
wuswójś/Z
wuśišćaś/Y
wuwisaś/Y
wuwóstaś/2
wuznojś/Z
wužraś/T
wuzymniś/V
wuzymnjeś/V
wuźaržaś/Y
zabarcaś/Y
zaběžaś/Y
zabincaś/Y
zabraś/T
zabydnuś/3
zabyś/3
zachórjeś/V
zadobyś/3
zadrěś/T
zagnercaś/Y
zagnurcaś/Y
zagójś/Z
zagórjeś/V
zajś/1
zakircaś/Y
zaklincaś/Y
zakłojś/Z
zakšawjeś/V
zakurcaś/Y
zakwicaś/Y
zamjelcaś/Y
zapowěźeś/VX
zapósłaś/T
zapśimjeś/V
zardžaś/Y
zaricaś/Y
zarzaś/U
zašiwaś/Y
zaškjarcaś/Y
zasłaś/T
zasłyšaś/Y
zasněśeś/V
zaspomnjeś/V
zastaś/2
zastepnjeś/V
zašwicaś/Y
zaśišćaś/Y
zawóstaś/2
zawusłyšaś/Y
zawustaś/2
zazarzaś/Y
zaznojś/Z
zažraś/T
zaźaržaś/UY
zblěźeś/V
zbrojś/Z
zbyś/3
zdobyś/3
zdźaržaś/Y
zebraś/T
zegnaś/T
zejmjeś/V
zejś/1
zešerjeś/V
zesłabjeś/V
zesraś/T
zestarjeś/V
zesurowjeś/V
zešwicaś/Y
ześišćaś/Y
zezarzaś/Y
zežołśeś/V
zežraś/T
zeźaržaś/Y
zgłodnjeś/V
zjěsć/hX
złacnjeś/V
zmarnjeś/V
změkleś/V
zmjernjeś/V
zmócnjeś/V
znojś/Z
žołśeś/V
zrojś/Z
zwódnjeś/V
zwóstaś/2
žydnjeś/V
źaržaś/U
źibjeś/V
